Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-549
Warehouse; notice to person storing grain; restriction on storage rates and charges; violation; penalty.

(1) At least once each calendar year and not later than one year from the date of receipt of the previous written notice, each warehouse licensee shall send written notice to each person who stores grain in such warehouse at such person's last-known address specifying the type and amount of grain in storage, the location at which the grain is being stored, and the current rate of storage.

(2) A warehouse licensee shall not charge any storage rates and charges other than or in addition to the schedule of storage rates and charges duly filed and posted pursuant to section 88-541.

(3) Any warehouse licensee who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 25;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 65;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 47.
July 19, 2024